Massachusetts, session 194th, H2980.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as amended by section 27 of
chapter 39 of the acts of 2021, is hereby further amended by inserting, in line 274, after the word
“facilities”, the following words: - and except any position explicitly classified in another group.
SECTION 2. Said section 3 of said chapter 32, as so amended, is hereby further amended
by inserting, in line 331, after the words “assistant deputy superintendent”, the following words:-
registered nurse, medication-assisted treatment nurse manager, psychiatric nurse, psychology
nurse practitioner, director of nursing, licensed practical nurse, nurse practitioner or paramedic.
of 1